Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.460

Grant program—Administration.

The secretary of state will administer the grant program and disburse funds from the election account established in the state treasury by the legislature in chapter 48, Laws of 2003. Only grant proposals from local government election offices will be reviewed. The secretary of state and any local government grant recipient shall enter into an agreement outlining the terms of the grant and a payment schedule. The payment schedule may allow the secretary of state to make payments directly to vendors contracted by the local government election office from Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252) funds. The secretary of state shall adopt any rules necessary to facilitate this section.

[ 2004 c 267 s 202.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.